Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201519-4029.03
Hearing for expansion of boundaries; call by petition.

In the event that the city council has not acted to call a hearing to expand district boundaries as provided in section 19-4029.02, it shall do so when presented with a petition signed by the users of thirty percent of space in a business area proposed to be added to an existing business improvement district where an occupation tax is imposed or by the record owners of thirty percent of the assessable front footage in a portion of a business area proposed to be added to an existing business improvement district.

Laws 2015, LB168, § 13.
August 30, 2015